Maryland, session 2026, HB0869.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
15–305.
(b) A license to deal in new vehicles may be issued only for a dealer in new vehicles
who holds a franchise from:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0869*

HOUSE BILL 869
(1) The manufacturer of the vehicles; or
(2) A distributor who is authorized by the manufacturer or the
manufacturer’s authorized importer of the vehicles.
(e) (2) (i) Notwithstanding subsections (b) and (f) of this section and
subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, a manufacturer or distributor may be
licensed as a dealer if:
1. The manufacturer or distributor deals only in electric or
nonfossil–fuel burning vehicles;
2. No dealer in the State holds a franchise from the
manufacturer or distributor;
3. The manufacturer or distributor, or a subsidiary, an
affiliate, or a controlled entity of the manufacturer or distributor, does not hold a controlling
interest in another manufacturer or distributor, or a subsidiary, an affiliate, or a controlled
entity of the other manufacturer or distributor, that is licensed as a dealer under this
paragraph; and
4. No other manufacturer or distributor, or subsidiary,
affiliate, or controlled entity of the other manufacturer or distributor, that is licensed as a
dealer under this paragraph, holds a controlling interest in the manufacturer or distributor,
or a subsidiary, an affiliate, or a controlled entity of the manufacturer or distributor.
(ii) 1. [No] SUBJECT TO SUBSUBPARAGRAPH 2 OF THIS
SUBPARAGRAPH, NOT more than [four] FIVE licenses may be issued under this
paragraph.
2. ONE LICENSE UNDER THIS PARAGRAPH MAY BE
ISSUED ONLY FOR THE OPERATION OF A DEALERSHIP IN THE CITY OF BOWIE.
(iii) The Administration shall adopt regulations to implement this
paragraph.
(f) A manufacturer or distributor, or a person who is acting for a partnership or
corporation that is owned or controlled by or under common control with a manufacturer
or distributor, may not sell a new vehicle to a retail buyer.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.